Utah statutes.
39-1-60.   Laws and regulations of United States control.
(1)  The National Guard of this state, the Utah State Defense Force serving
under Title 39, Chapter 4, and the unorganized militia are at all times
subject to the laws and military regulations of the United States governing
them, while serving under Title 32, United States Code and the laws and
military rules of the state.
(2)  The governor may make rules as necessary to make the laws and military
regulations of the United States effective within the state.
